Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7463
Rules and regulations.

The department, upon the recommendation of the board, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Wholesale Drug Distributor Licensing Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 22;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7422;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 37.